Washington statutes.
RCW 41.20.005

Definitions.

As used in chapter 41.20 RCW:

(1) "Rank" means civil service rank.

(2) "Position" means the particular employment held at any particular time, which may or may not be the same as civil service rank.

(3) Words importing masculine gender shall extend to females also.

(4) "Salary" means the basic monthly rate of salary or wages, including longevity pay but not including overtime earnings or special salary or wages.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 39; 1959 c 78 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—Construction—1969 ex.s. c 209: See RCW 41.26.3901, 41.26.3902, and 41.26.3903.